Illinois, session 104th, HB3552.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Local 5Accessory Dwelling Unit Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Accessory dwelling unit" means an attached or a detached 8residential dwelling unit that provides complete independent 9living facilities for one or more persons and is located on a 10lot with a proposed or existing principal residence and must 11include permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, 12cooking, and sanitation on the same parcel as the 13single-family or multi-family dwelling it is or will be 14situated. "Accessory dwelling unit" includes, but is not 15limited to:16        (1) an efficiency unit; and17        (2) a manufactured home, as that term is defined in 18    paragraph (53) of subsection (a) of Section 9-102 of the 19    Uniform Commercial Code.20    "Discretionary review" means review of a housing proposal 21or building permit application by a government official or 22governing body which involves personal judgment by any public 23officials and involves any criteria other than whether a   HB3552- 2 -LRB104 11169 RTM 21251 b1proposal meets pre-existing building codes or design 2standards. 3    "Efficiency unit" means a unit for occupancy by no more 4than 2 persons which has a minimum floor area of 150 square 5feet and may also have a partial kitchen or bathroom 6facilities.7    "Multi-family dwelling" means any improved real property 8used or intended to be used as a residence and that contains 9more than one dwelling unit. "Multi-family dwelling" includes, 10but is not limited to, a condominium or cooperative, and 11single room occupancy housing developments.12    "Off-street parking" means parking facilities for the 13parking of motor vehicles off the public streets. "Off-street 14parking" includes:15        (1) graded, regraded, graveled, oiled, surfaced, 16    macadamized, paved, curbed, guttered, and drained sites 17    used for parking motor vehicles off the public streets;18        (2) driveways, ramps, structures, buildings, 19    elevators, and traffic control equipment used for parking 20    motor vehicles off the public streets; and21        (3) all appurtenances and incidentals necessary, 22    useful, or desirable for parking motor vehicles off the 23    public streets.24    "Principal dwelling unit" means an existing or proposed 25single-family dwelling or multi-family dwelling that is 26located on the lot where the accessory dwelling unit will be   HB3552- 3 -LRB104 11169 RTM 21251 b1constructed or converted.2    "Single-family dwelling" means a residential building 3structure that is designed and used as a single unit of 4residential occupancy, housing one family, with direct access 5to the outside, and providing complete, independent living 6facilities including provisions for living, sleeping, eating, 7cooking, and sanitation. 8    Section 10. Regulation of accessory dwelling units.9    (a) A unit of local government may not prohibit the 10building or usage of accessory dwelling units in the unit of 11local government.12    (b) A unit of local government may provide reasonable 13regulations relating to the size and location of accessory 14dwelling units similar to other accessory structures unless a 15regulation would have the effect of prohibiting accessory 16dwelling units of at least 1,200 square feet.17    (c) For the purposes of this Act, a regulation is 18considered to have the effect of prohibiting an accessory 19dwelling unit if it:20        (1) explicitly disallows the construction of accessory 21    dwelling units;22        (2) contain fees other than building permit review 23    fees;24        (3) applies standards that would render such units 25    inconsistent with other local land use laws;  HB3552- 4 -LRB104 11169 RTM 21251 b1        (4) imposes design, bulk, and density standards that 2    would physically preclude the project;3        (5) requires off-street parking spaces; or4        (6) requires corrections of nonconformities of the 5    principal dwelling unit. 6    Section 15. Applications to create or serve accessory 7dwelling units.8    (a) When a unit of local government that has not adopted an 9ordinance governing accessory dwelling units receives an 10application for a permit to create or serve an accessory 11dwelling unit, the unit of local government shall approve or 12disapprove the application by right and without discretionary 13review. The unit of local government shall either approve or 14deny the application to create or serve an accessory dwelling 15unit within 60 days from the date the unit of local government 16receives a completed application if there is an existing 17single-family or multi-family dwelling on the lot. If the 18permit application to create or serve an accessory dwelling 19unit is submitted with a permit application to create or serve 20a new single-family or multi-family dwelling on the lot, then 21the unit of local government may delay approving or denying 22the permit application for the accessory dwelling unit until 23the unit of local government approves or denies the permit 24application to create or serve the new single-family dwelling 25or multi-family dwelling, but the application to create or   HB3552- 5 -LRB104 11169 RTM 21251 b1serve the accessory dwelling unit shall still be considered by 2right and without discretionary review or a hearing. If the 3applicant requests a delay, the 60-day time period shall be 4tolled for the period of the delay. If the unit of local 5government has not approved or denied the completed 6application within 60 days, then the application shall be 7deemed approved.8    (b) If a unit of local government denies an application 9for an accessory dwelling unit under subsection (a), then the 10unit of local government shall, within the time period 11described in subsection (a), return a full set of comments to 12the applicant in writing with a list of items that are 13defective or deficient and a description of how the 14application can be remedied by the applicant.15    (c) The unit of local government shall not deny an 16application for a permit to create an accessory dwelling unit 17due to the correction of nonconforming zoning conditions, 18building code violations, or unpermitted structures that do 19not present a threat to public health and safety and are not 20affected by the construction of the accessory dwelling unit. 21    Section 20. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 22accessory dwelling units in a manner inconsistent with this 23Act. This Act is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 24of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 25exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised   HB3552- 6 -LRB104 11169 RTM 21251 b1by the State.